Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.090

Times for inspection and copying—Posting on website.

Public records shall be available for inspection and copying during the customary office hours of the agency, the office of the secretary of the senate, and the office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives for a minimum of thirty hours per week, except weeks that include state legal holidays, unless the person making the request and the agency, the office of the secretary of the senate, or the office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives or its representative agree on a different time. Customary business hours must be posted on the agency or office's website and made known by other means designed to provide the public with notice.

[ 2009 c 428 s 2; 1995 c 397 s 12; 1973 c 1 s 28 (Initiative Measure No. 276, approved November 7, 1972). Formerly RCW 42.17.280.]